District of Columbia statutes.
22-3322

Fines under § 22-3321 to be collected in name of United States.

The fines provided for in § 22-3321 shall be collected in the name of the United States.

R.S., D.C., §§ 1, 2, 96, 270
June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 102, ch. 180

History

1981 Ed., § 22-3122.
1973 Ed., § 22-3122.

Prior Codifications